Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Article 2. Procedures for Forfeiture of Vehicles Seized in Motor Vehicle Scrapping or Dismantling Violations.

§ 63-21-101.
Seizure of motor vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance for violations of Section 63-21-39.

Any motor vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance used to transport another motor vehicle or crushed motor vehicle sold in violation of Section 63-21-39 or otherwise used to aid in the commission of a violation of Section 63-21-39 may be seized by a law enforcement agency and is subject to forfeiture ordered by the court in the manner and under the terms and conditions set out for forfeitures of a vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance in this article; however, no conveyance is subject to forfeiture under this article by reason of any act or omission proved by the owner thereof to have been committed or omitted without his knowledge or consent. If the seizing law enforcement agency has reason to believe that the conveyance is a leased or rented conveyance, then the seizing law enforcement agency shall notify the owner of the conveyance as soon as practicable after the seizure. A forfeiture of a conveyance encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if he neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 570, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 63-21-103.
Vehicles subject to seizure; notice of intent to forfeit seized vehicle; petition to contest forfeiture.

When any vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance is used in the commission of a violation of Section 63-21-39, the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance so used is subject to seizure by the applicable law enforcement agency and the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance may be forfeited by the administrative forfeiture procedures provided for in Sections 63-21-101 through 63-21-107.

The attorney for or any representative of the seizing law enforcement agency shall provide notice of intention to forfeit the seized vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance administratively, either by certified mail, return receipt requested, or by personal delivery, to all persons who are required to be notified pursuant to this section.

In the event that notice of intention to forfeit the seized vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance administratively cannot be given as provided in subsection (2) of this section because of refusal, failure to claim, insufficient address or any other reason, the attorney for or representative of the seizing law enforcement agency shall provide notice by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the seizure occurred for once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks.

Notice pursuant to subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall include the following information:

A description of the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance;

The approximate value of the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance;

The date and place of the seizure;

The connection between the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance and the violation of Section 63-21-39;

The instructions for filing a request for judicial review; and

A statement that the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance will be forfeited to the seizing law enforcement agency if a request for judicial review is not timely filed.

Any person claiming an interest in a vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance which is the subject of a notice under this section may, within thirty (30) days after receipt of the notice or of the date of the first publication of the notice, file a petition to contest forfeiture signed by the claimant in the county court, if a county court exists, or otherwise in the circuit court of the county in which the seizure is made or the county in which the criminal prosecution is brought, in order to claim an interest in the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance. Upon the filing of the petition and the payment of the filing fees, service of the petition shall be made on the attorney for or representative of the seizing law enforcement agency, and the proceedings shall thereafter be governed by the rules of civil procedure.

If no petition to contest forfeiture is timely filed, the attorney for the seizing law enforcement agency shall prepare a written declaration of forfeiture of the subject vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance and the forfeited vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance shall be used, distributed or disposed of in accordance with the provisions of Section 63-21-107.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 570, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 63-21-105.
Forfeiture procedures.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 63-21-101, when any vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance is seized under this article, proceedings under this section shall be instituted within thirty (30) days from the date of seizure or the subject vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance shall be immediately returned to the party from whom seized.

A petition for forfeiture shall be filed in the name of the county or the municipality and may be filed in the county in which the seizure is made, the county in which the criminal prosecution is brought or the county in which the owner of the seized vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance is found. Forfeiture proceedings may be brought in the circuit court or the county court if a county court exists in the county and the value of the seized vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance is within the jurisdictional limits of the county court as set forth in Section 9-9-21, Mississippi Code of 1972. A copy of such petition shall be served upon the following persons by service of process in the same manner as in civil cases:

The owner of the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance, if address is known;

Any secured party who has a registered lien or security interest or a lien or security interest of which law enforcement has actual knowledge, if the identity of such secured party can be ascertained by the local law enforcement agency by making a good faith effort to ascertain the identity of such secured party as described in subsections (3) and (4) of this section;

Any other bona fide lienholder or secured party or other person holding an interest in a vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance in the nature of a security interest of whom the local law enforcement agency has actual knowledge;

Any person in possession of vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance subject to forfeiture at the time that it was seized.

If the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance is a motor vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance susceptible of titling under the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Title Law and if there is any reasonable cause to believe that the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance has been titled, the local law enforcement agency shall make inquiry of the Mississippi Department of Revenue as to what the records of the department show as to who is the record owner of the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance and who, if anyone, holds any lien or security interest which affects the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance.

If the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance is a motor vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance and is not titled in the State of Mississippi, then the local law enforcement agency shall attempt to ascertain the name and address of the person in whose name the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance is licensed, and if the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance is licensed in a state which has in effect a certificate of title law, the local law enforcement agency shall make inquiry of the appropriate agency of that state as to what the records of the agency show as to who is the record owner of the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance and who, if anyone, holds any lien, security interest or other instrument in the nature of a security device which affects the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance.

In the event the answer to an inquiry states that the record owner of the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance is any person other than the person who was in possession of it when it was seized, or states that any person holds any lien, encumbrance, security interest, other interest in the nature of a security interest, the local law enforcement agency shall cause any record owner and also any lienholder, secured party, other person who holds an interest in the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance in the nature of a security interest, to be named in the petition of forfeiture and to be served with process in the same manner as in civil cases.

If the owner of the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance cannot be found and served with a copy of the petition of forfeiture, or if no person was in possession of the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance subject to forfeiture at the time that it was seized and the owner of the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance is unknown, the local law enforcement agency shall file with the clerk of the court in which the proceeding is pending an affidavit to such effect, whereupon the clerk of the court shall publish notice of the hearing addressed to “the Unknown Owner of_______________ ,” filling in the blank space with a reasonably detailed description of the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance subject to forfeiture. Service by publication shall contain the other requisites prescribed in Section 11-33-41, and shall be served as provided in Section 11-33-37, Mississippi Code of 1972, for publication of notice for attachments at law.

No proceedings instituted pursuant to the provisions of this article shall proceed to hearing unless the judge conducting the hearing is satisfied that this section has been complied with. Any answer received from an inquiry required by subsections (3) through (4) of this section shall be introduced into evidence at the hearing.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 570, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 63-21-107.
Answer; hearing.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 63-21-101, an owner of a vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance that has been seized shall file an answer within thirty (30) days after the completion of service of process. If an answer is not filed, the court shall hear evidence that the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance is subject to forfeiture and forfeit the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance to the local law enforcement agency. If an answer is filed, a time for hearing on forfeiture shall be set within thirty (30) days of filing the answer or at the succeeding term of court if court would not be in progress within thirty (30) days after filing the answer. Provided, however, that upon request by the local law enforcement agency or the owner of the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance, the court may postpone said forfeiture hearing to a date past the time any criminal action is pending against said owner.

If the owner of the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance has filed an answer denying that the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance is subject to forfeiture, then the burden is on the petitioner to prove that the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance is subject to forfeiture. However, if an answer has not been filed by the owner of the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance, the petition for forfeiture may be introduced into evidence and is prima facie evidence that the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance is subject to forfeiture. The standard of proof placed upon the petitioner in regard to a vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance forfeited under the provisions of this article shall be by a preponderance of the evidence.

At the hearing any claimant of any right, title or interest in the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance may prove his lien, encumbrance, security interest, or other interest in the nature of a security interest, to be bona fide and created without knowledge or consent that the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance was to be used so as to cause the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance to be subject to forfeiture.

If it is found that the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance is subject to forfeiture, then the judge shall forfeit the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance to the local law enforcement agency. However, if proof at the hearing discloses that the interest of any bona fide lienholder, secured party, other person holding an interest in the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance in the nature of a security interest or any holder of a bona fide encumbrance is greater than or equal to the present value of the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance, the court shall order the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance released to him. If such interest is less than the present value of the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance and if the proof shows that the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance is subject to forfeiture, the court shall order the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance forfeited to the local law enforcement agency.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 570, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 63-21-109.
Sale of forfeited vehicle; use of forfeited vehicles by law enforcement agencies; distribution of proceeds from liquidation of forfeited vehicle.

Any other vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance that has been forfeited shall, except as otherwise provided, be sold at a public auction for cash by the chief law enforcement officer of the initiating law enforcement agency, or his designee, to the highest and best bidder after advertising the sale for at least once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks, the last notice to appear not more than ten (10) days nor less than five (5) days prior to such sale, in a newspaper having a general circulation in the jurisdiction in which said law enforcement agency is located. Such notices shall contain a description of the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance to be sold and a statement of the time and place of sale. It shall not be necessary to the validity of such sale either to have the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance present at the place of sale or to have the name of the owner thereof stated in such notice. The proceeds of the sale shall be disposed of as follows:

To any bona fide lienholder, secured party or other party holding an interest in the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance in the nature of a security interest, to the extent of his interest; and

The balance, if any, remaining after deduction of all storage, court costs and expenses of liquidation shall be divided, forwarded and deposited in the same manner set out in subsection (3) of this section.

Any county or municipal law enforcement agency may maintain, repair, use and operate for official purposes any vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance, that is described in subsection (1) of this section, that has been forfeited to the agency if it is free from any interest of a bona fide lienholder, secured party or other party who holds an interest in the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance in the nature of a security interest. Such county or municipal law enforcement agency may purchase the interest of a bona fide lienholder, secured party or other party who holds an interest so that the vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance can be released for its use. The law enforcement agency shall be deemed to be the purchaser, and the certificate of title shall be issued to it.

(i) If a vehicle is forfeited to or transferred to a sheriff’s department, then the sheriff may transfer the vehicle to the county for official or governmental use as the board of supervisors may direct.

If a vehicle is forfeited to or transferred to a police department, then the police chief may transfer the vehicle to the municipality for official or governmental use as the governing authority of the municipality may direct.

If a motor vehicle forfeited to a county or municipal law enforcement agency becomes obsolete or is no longer needed for official or governmental purposes, it may be disposed of in accordance with Section 19-7-5 or in the manner provided by law for disposing of municipal vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance.

Any vehicle, trailer or similar conveyance which is forfeited under this article, except as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, shall be liquidated and, after deduction of court costs and the expenses of liquidation, the proceeds shall be divided and deposited as follows:

In the event only one (1) law enforcement agency participates in the underlying criminal case out of which the forfeiture arises, one hundred percent (100%) of the proceeds shall be deposited and credited to the budget of the participating law enforcement agency.

In the event more than one (1) law enforcement agency participates in the underlying criminal case out of which the forfeiture arises, eighty percent (80%) of the proceeds shall be deposited and credited to the budget of the law enforcement agency whose officers initiated the criminal case and twenty percent (20%) shall be divided equitably between or among the other participating law enforcement agencies, and shall be deposited and credited to the budgets of the participating law enforcement agencies. In the event that the other participating law enforcement agencies cannot agree on the division of their twenty percent (20%), a petition shall be filed by any one of them in the court in which the civil forfeiture case is brought and the court shall make an equitable division.

The Department of Revenue shall issue a certificate of title to any person who purchases property under the provisions of this section when a certificate of title is required under the laws of this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 570, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 63-21-111.
Exclusiveness of remedy.

The forfeiture procedure set forth in this article are the sole remedy of any claimant, and no court shall have jurisdiction to interfere therewith by replevin, injunction, supersedeas or in any other manner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 570, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2013.